West Virginia, session 2025, HB2333.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 10. Authorization for Department of commerce to promulgate legislative rules. §64-10-1. Division of Natural Resources. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 14, 2024, authorized under the authority of §20-7-13 of this code, relating to the Division of Natural Resources (boating, 58 CSR 25), is authorized.